Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.085

Credentialing by endorsement.

An applicant holding a credential in another state, territory, or the District of Columbia may be credentialed to practice in this state without examination if the board determines that the other state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 1996 c 200 s 10; 1991 c 332 s 31.]

NOTES:

Application to scope of practice—Captions not law—1991 c 332: See notes following RCW 18.130.010.